District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
bill may be cited as the “Saint Romero Plaza Designation Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 of the Street and Alley Closing and Acquisition Procedures
Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official Code § 9-204.01 and 9-
204.22), the Council designates the public right-of-way abutting Square 2675 , Lot 832 , at the corner
of Sacred Heart Way and 16th Street Northwest, as “San Romero Plaza”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement. The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget
Director as the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures
Act of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a). The
Secretary to the Council shall transmit a copy of this bill, upon its effective date to the Director of the
Department of Parks and Recreation.
Sec. 4. Effective date. This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event
of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia
Register.